Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202537-1274
Amphibious vehicle; registration; certificate of title; provisions not applicable.

Sections 37-1211 to 37-1231 and 37-1275 to 37-12,108 shall not apply to an amphibious vehicle if a current and valid registration has been issued for such amphibious vehicle under the Motor Vehicle Registration Act.

Laws 2025, LB97, § 5.

Motor Vehicle Registration Act, see section 60-301.